Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB562.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 402.1(2) of the act of December 5, 1936 (2nd Sp.Sess., 1937 P.L.2897, No.1), known as the Unemployment Compensation Law, is amended to read:Section 402.1. Benefits Based on Service for Educational Institutions.--Benefits based on service for educational institutions pursuant to Article X, XI or XII shall as 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425 hereinafter provided be payable in the same amount, on the same terms and subject to the same conditions as outlined in section 404(g); except that:* * *(2) (i) With respect to services performed after October 31, 1983, and prior to the effective date of this subclause, in any other capacity for an educational institution, benefits shall not be paid on the basis of such services to any individual for any week which commences during a period between two successive academic years or terms if such individual performs such services in the first of such academic years or terms and there is a reasonable assurance that such individual will perform such services in the second of such academic years or terms.(ii) With respect to services performed on and after the effective date of this subclause in any other capacity for an educational institution, benefits shall be paid on the basis of such services to any individual described in subclause (i), regardless of whether or not there is a reasonable assurance that such individual will perform such services in the second of such academic years or terms, to the extent permitted under 26 U.S.C. § 3304(a)(6) (relating to approval of State laws), so long as the individual is otherwise eligible for benefits.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0562PN0555 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425